Massachusetts, session 194th, H3783.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 13D of Chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended, in line 22, by striking the words “Motorcycle Safety
Foundation” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “Massachusetts Motorcycle
Rider Education Program”.
SECTION 2. Section 32G of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended, in lines 190-191, by striking the words “Motorcycle Safety
Foundation” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “Massachusetts Motorcycle
Rider Education Program”
of 1